California statutes. Insurance Code
(e) In the case of group insurance policies, the disclosure form shall be delivered together with the application
 for the certificate, or with the certificate of coverage or any related document furnished by the insurer for the certificate holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 98, Sec. 7.   (AB 2180)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.4.

An insurer shall file with the commissioner an actuarial memorandum prepared, dated, and signed by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries that includes all of the following information:

(a) A description of the accelerated death benefit, including the effects of payment of the accelerated death benefit on all life insurance policy benefits and any subsequent accelerated death benefits, premium payments, cost of
 insurance rates, and values, including any outstanding loan, if applicable, for all types of forms with which the accelerated death benefit will be used.

(b) A description of, and justification for, expense charges associated with the accelerated death benefit and the maximum expense charges.

(c) A description of the interest rate or interest rate methodology used in any present value calculation or in accruing interest on the amount of the accelerated death benefit, which shall not exceed the greater of the current yield on 90-day treasury bills, or a variable rate determined in accordance with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) Model Policy Loan Interest Rate Bill No. 590.

(d) A description of the mortality basis and methodology, including the period of time applicable to any mortality
 discount, used in any present value calculation of the accelerated death benefit.

(e) A description of the mortality and morbidity basis and methodology used in the determination of any separate premium or costs of insurance for the accelerated death benefit.

(f) The formula used to determine the accelerated death benefit, including any limitations on the amount of the benefit, and the formula used to determine the postacceleration premium for the accelerated death benefit as well as the life insurance policy.

(g) A sample calculation of the accelerated death benefit. If the life insurance policy contains a loan provision, the example shall assume that there is an outstanding loan on the date of acceleration. All policy and accelerated death benefit benefits, premium payments, cost of insurance charges and values,
 including the outstanding loan, if applicable, immediately before and immediately after acceleration shall be shown in the example.

(h) If an accelerated death benefit will be paid in installments, the actuarial memorandum shall explain the basis used in the calculation of the minimum periodic payment for the payment period and a sample calculation of a minimum periodic payment, and the basis used, and a sample calculation of the lump sum payable if the insured dies before all periodic payments for the payment period are made.

(i) (1) For any accelerated death benefit subject to this article, a certification that the value and premium of the accelerated death benefit is 10 percent or less of the total value of the benefits over the life of the policy. These values shall be measured as of the date of issue.

(2) The certification shall be in the following form:

 

“I,____________________of ___________________________ am a Member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries and am qualified to provide this Certification with respect to the accelerated death benefit described in the Actuarial Memorandum to which this Certification is attached.

I certify that:

(1) The value of the benefits provided, on an aggregated basis, in respect of the filed accelerated death benefit, determined according to the formula below applied over a range of underwriting classes and plans at which the benefit is being made available, is not in any case greater than 10%.

(NSP2 – NSP1) / NSP1

Where:

(a) NSP1 and NSP2 are determined using an effective annual interest rate of 6%.

(b) NSP1 is the net single premium for the base policy benefits assuming there is no accelerated death benefit.

(c) NSP2 is the net single premium for the base policy benefits assuming that the full death benefit is paid at time of death or the occurrence of the non-death accelerated death benefit trigger.

(2) In developing the assumptions, other than the interest assumption, used in calculating NSP1 and NSP2, I have complied with all applicable laws, regulations, and Actuarial Standards of Practice (ASOPs). The assumptions used represent anticipated experience factors, as defined in actuarial literature and by generally accepted actuarial practice.

(3) The assumptions, other than the interest assumption, used in calculating NSP1 and NSP2 will be reviewed at least annually by the Company to ensure that the value of the accelerated death benefit provided, as defined in (1) above, continues to be incidental. If, after such review and while this accelerated death benefit is being actively issued, the value of the benefits provided by this benefit are no longer incidental based on then current anticipated experience factors, the Company will discontinue offering the accelerated death benefit which is no longer incidental.

(4) If a separate premium or cost of insurance (COI) charge is being charged for the accelerated death benefit provided, the ratio of the present value of the accelerated death benefit premiums or COI charges over the life of the policy to the present value of the policy premiums or COI charges exclusive of any
 riders, does not exceed 10%. The present values in this item (4) are determined using an effective annual interest rate of 6%.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.5.

(a) Applications, if any, or forms supporting an application, if any, for accelerated death benefits shall contain clear, unambiguous, short, and simple questions designed to ascertain the health condition of the applicant. Each health-related question shall contain only one health status inquiry and shall require only a “yes” or “no” answer, except that the application may include a request for the name of any prescribed medication and the name of the prescribing physician. If the application requests the name of any prescribed medication or the prescribing physician, then any mistake or omission shall not be used as a basis for the denial of a claim or the rescission of the accelerated death benefit or life insurance policy or certificate.

(b) The following
 warning shall be printed conspicuously and in close conjunction with the applicant’s signature block:

 

“Caution: If your answers on this application are misstated or untrue, the insurer may have the right to deny benefits or rescind your accelerated death benefit coverage.”

 

(c) If an insurer does not complete medical underwriting for the accelerated death benefit separate from underwriting for the life insurance policy and resolve all reasonable questions arising from information submitted on or with an application before issuing the accelerated death benefit, then the insurer may only rescind the accelerated death benefit or life insurance policy or certificate or deny an otherwise valid claim upon clear and convincing evidence of fraud or material misrepresentation of
 the risk by the applicant. The evidence shall do all of the following:

(1) Pertain to the condition for which benefits are sought.

(2) Involve a chronic condition or involve dates of treatment before the date of application.

(3) Be material to the acceptance for coverage.

(d) An accelerated death benefit may not be field issued.

(e) The contestability period for a life insurance policy or certificate that contains an accelerated death benefit shall comply with paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10271.

(f) A copy of the completed application shall be delivered to the insured at the time of delivery of the life
 insurance policy or certificate that contains an accelerated death benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 98, Sec. 8.   (AB 2180)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.6.

(a) When a policyholder or certificate holder requests an acceleration of death benefits, the insurer shall send a statement to the policyholder or certificate holder and irrevocable beneficiary showing any effect that the payment of the accelerated death benefit would have on the policy’s cash value, accumulation account, death benefit, premium, policy loans, and policy liens. The statement shall disclose that receipt of accelerated death benefit payments may adversely affect the recipient’s eligibility for Medicaid or other government benefits or entitlements. In addition, receipt of an accelerated death benefit payment may be taxable and assistance should be sought from a personal tax adviser. When a previous disclosure statement becomes invalid as a result of an acceleration of the death benefit, the insurer shall send a
 revised disclosure statement to the policyholder or certificate holder and irrevocable beneficiary.

(b) The accelerated death benefit shall be effective not more than 30 days following the effective date of the policy provision, rider, endorsement, or certificate.

(c) If the insurer charges a separate premium for the accelerated death benefit, then the insurer may also offer a waiver of premium benefit as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10271.1. At the time the waiver of the accelerated death benefit premium benefit is claimed, the insurer shall explain any continuing premium requirement to keep the underlying policy in force.

(d) An insurer shall not unfairly discriminate among insureds with different qualifying events covered under the policy or among insureds with similar qualifying events covered under the
 policy. An insurer shall not apply further conditions on the payment of the accelerated death benefits other than those conditions specified in the accelerated death benefit.

(e) No later than one month after payment of an accelerated death benefit, the insurer shall provide the policyholder or certificate holder with a report of any accelerated death benefits paid out during the prior month, an explanation of any changes to the policy or certificate, death benefits, and cash values on account of the benefits being paid out, and the amount of the remaining benefits that can be accelerated at the end of the prior month. The insurer may use a calendar month or policy or certificate month.

(f) The conversion benefit available to group certificate holders on termination of employment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10209 shall include a benefit comparable to
 the accelerated death benefit. This requirement may be satisfied by an individual policy or certificate. This requirement, subject to the approval of the commissioner, may be satisfied by arrangement with another insurer to provide the required coverage.

(g) When payment of an accelerated death benefit results in a pro rata reduction in cash value, the payment may be applied toward repaying a portion of the loan equal to a pro rata portion of any outstanding policy loans if disclosure of the effect of acceleration upon any remaining death benefit, cash value or accumulation account, policy loan, and premium payments, including a statement of the possibility of termination of any remaining death benefit, is provided to the policyholder or certificate holder. The policyholder or certificate holder shall provide written consent authorizing any other arrangement for the repayment of outstanding policy loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 98, Sec. 9.   (AB 2180)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.7.

(a) The insurer may require a premium charge or cost of insurance charge for the accelerated death benefit. This charge shall be based on sound actuarial principles. In the case of group insurance, the additional cost may also be reflected in the experience rating.

(b) (1) The insurer may pay a present value of the face amount. The calculation shall be based on any applicable
 actuarial discount appropriate to the policy design. The interest rate or interest rate methodology used in the calculation shall be based on sound actuarial principles and disclosed in the contract or actuarial memorandum required in Section 10295.4. The maximum interest rate used shall be no greater than the greater of one of the following:

(A) The current yield on 90-day treasury bills.

(B) The current maximum statutory adjustable policy loan interest rate.

(2) The interest rate accrued on the portion of the lien that is equal in amount to the cash value of the life insurance policy at the time of the supplemental benefit acceleration shall be not more than the policy loan interest rate stated in the contract.

(c) (1) Except as
 provided in paragraph (2), when an accelerated death benefit is payable, there shall not be more than a pro rata reduction in the cash value based on the percentage of death benefits accelerated to produce the accelerated death benefit payment.

(2) Alternatively, the payment of accelerated death benefits, any administrative expense charges, any future premiums, and any accrued interest can be considered a lien against the death benefit of the life insurance policy and access to the cash value of the life insurance policy may be restricted to any excess of the cash value over the sum of any other outstanding loans and the lien. Future access to additional policy loans may also be limited to any excess of the cash value over the sum of the lien and any other outstanding policy loans.

(d) When payment of an accelerated death benefit results in a pro rata reduction in the cash value
 of the life insurance policy, the payment shall not be applied toward repaying an amount greater than a pro rata portion of any outstanding policy loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.8.

(a) An applicant for an accelerated death benefit shall have the right to return the accelerated death benefit policy or certificate by first-class United States mail within 30 days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the applicant is not satisfied for any reason. If the accelerated death benefit is purchased as an endorsement or rider at the same time as the base life insurance policy, then the
 endorsement or rider may be returned within 30 days. The underlying life insurance policy shall be otherwise subject to this code.

(b) The return of a life insurance policy or certificate that contains an accelerated death benefit, or the return of an accelerated death benefit rider or endorsement, shall void the life insurance policy, certificate, rider, or endorsement from the beginning, and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy, certificate, rider, or endorsement had been issued. All premiums paid and any policy fee paid for the accelerated death benefit shall be fully refunded directly to the applicant by the insurer within 30 days after the policy, rider, endorsement, or certificate is returned.

(c) Policies, certificates, riders, or endorsements to which this section applies shall have a notice prominently printed, or attached thereto, stating in
 substance the conditions described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.9.

(a) Application forms for accelerated death benefits shall include a question designed to elicit information as to whether the accelerated death benefit is intended to replace any long-term care insurance presently in force. A supplementary application or other form to be signed by the applicant containing that question may be used.

(b) (1) An insurer, broker, agent, or other
 person shall not cause a policyholder to replace a long-term care insurance policy unnecessarily. This section shall not be construed to allow an insurer, broker, agent, or other person to cause a policyholder to replace a long-term care insurance policy or life insurance policy subject to this section that will result in a decrease in benefits and an increase in premium.

(2) It shall be presumed that any third or greater policy sold to a policyholder in any 12-month period is unnecessary within the meaning of this section. This section shall not apply to those instances in which a policy is replaced solely for the purpose of consolidating policies with a single insurer.

(c) Upon determining that a sale will involve a replacement of a life insurance policy subject to this section or replacement of a long-term care insurance policy, an insurer or its agent shall furnish the
 applicant, prior to issuance or delivery of a policy, certificate, rider, or endorsement, a notice regarding replacement of life insurance that includes an accelerated death benefit, or long-term care insurance coverage with a life insurance policy or certificate that contains an accelerated death benefit. One copy of this notice shall be retained by the applicant and an additional copy signed by the applicant shall be retained by the insurer. The required notice shall be provided in the following form:

 

“NOTICE TO APPLICANT REGARDING REPLACEMENT OF LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE OR LIFE INSURANCE INCLUDING ACCELERATED DEATH BENEFITS

According to (your application) (information you have furnished), you intend to lapse or otherwise terminate existing life insurance or long-term care insurance and replace it with a life insurance policy with an accelerated death
 benefit to be issued by (company name) Insurance Company. Your new accelerated death benefit coverage provides 30 days within which you may decide, without cost, whether you desire to keep the coverage. Please note that your underlying life insurance policy may only provide for a 10-day period during which you may decide, without cost, whether you will keep the coverage. For your own information and protection, you should be aware of, and seriously consider, certain factors that may affect the insurance protection available to you under the new coverage.

This accelerated death benefit is NOT Nursing Home, Home Care, or Long-Term Care Insurance, and it is not intended or designed to eliminate your need for that coverage. There are no restrictions or limitations on the use of the accelerated death benefit proceeds.

If you want long-term care insurance, you should consult with an insurance agent licensed to sell that
 insurance, inquire with the insurance company offering the accelerated death benefits, or visit the California Department of Insurance Internet Web site (www.insurance.ca.gov) that provides information regarding long-term care insurance.

If you want to replace existing coverage with life insurance that includes an accelerated death benefit, you should note the following:

(1) Receipt of accelerated death benefits may be taxable. Prior to electing to buy the accelerated death benefit, policyholders or certificate holders should seek assistance from a qualified tax adviser.

(2) Receipt of accelerated death benefits may affect eligibility for public assistance programs, such as Medi-Cal or Medicaid. Prior to electing to buy the accelerated death benefit, the applicant/buyer should consult with the appropriate social services agency concerning
 how receipt of accelerated death benefits may affect that eligibility.

You may wish to secure the advice of your present insurer or its agent regarding the proposed replacement of your present coverage. This is not only your right, but it is also in your best interest to make sure you understand all the relevant factors involved in replacing your present coverage.

If, after due consideration, you still wish to terminate your present coverage and replace it with new coverage, be certain to truthfully and completely answer all questions on the application concerning your medical health history. Failure to include all material medical information on an application may provide a basis for the company to deny any future claims and to refund your premium as though your coverage had never been in force. After the application has been completed and before you sign it, reread it carefully to be certain that all the information has
 been properly recorded.

The above “Notice to Applicant” was delivered to me on:

(Date)

(Applicant’s Signature)”

 

(d) The replacement notice shall include the following statement except when the replacement coverage is group insurance:

 

“COMPARISON TO YOUR CURRENT COVERAGE: I have reviewed your current coverage. To the best of my knowledge, the replacement of insurance involved in this transaction materially improves your position for the following reasons:

____ Additional or different benefits

(please specify) ______.

____ No change in benefits, but lower premiums.

____ Fewer benefits and lower premiums.

____ Other (please specify) ______.

(Signature of Agent and Name of Insurer)

(Signature of Applicant)

(Date)

 

(e) In recommending the purchase or replacement of any policy or certificate issued under this section, an agent shall make reasonable efforts to determine the appropriateness of a recommended purchase or replacement.

(f) The replacing policy or certificate shall not contain a provision establishing a new waiting period in the event existing coverage is converted to, or
 replaced by, a new or other form within the same insurer, except with respect to an increase in benefits voluntarily selected by the insured individual or group policyholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.10.

An insurer may not:

(a) Cancel, nonrenew, or otherwise terminate an accelerated death benefit on the grounds of the age or the deterioration of the mental or physical health of the insured individual or certificate holder.

(b) Terminate a policy, certificate, or rider, or contain a provision that allows the premium for an in-force policy, certificate, or
 rider, to be increased due to the divorce of a policyholder or certificate holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.11.

(a) An accelerated death benefit shall not be advertised or marketed as long-term care insurance, nursing home insurance, or home care insurance. Any advertisement, description, comparison, marketing material, or illustration shall state in bold type:

“This is a life insurance benefit that also gives you the option to accelerate some or all of the death benefit in the event that you meet the criteria for a qualifying event described in the policy. This policy or certificate does not provide long-term care insurance subject to California long-term care insurance law. This policy or certificate is not a California Partnership for Long-Term Care program policy. This policy or certificate is not a Medicare supplement (policy or certificate).”

An
 insurer shall also include in any advertisement or marketing materials for these insurance policies all of the following:

(1) A statement that the policy or certificate pays proceeds that are or are not intended to receive favorable tax treatment under Section 101(g) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 101(g)).

(2) A description of the accelerated death benefits provided by the policy, including a description of the acceleration of the death benefit to pay an unrestricted cash benefit when the insured has become chronically ill or otherwise eligible for benefits from a qualified event.

(3) A comparison between the benefits provided by life insurance policies, riders, or endorsements that contain accelerated death benefits and the benefits provided by long-term care insurance.

(b) Advertising for term life insurance policies or certificates that contain an accelerated death benefit to be attached to an existing term life policy shall include a prominent statement that the accelerated death benefit will terminate with the policy.

(c) On or after January 1, 2014, every insurer offering accelerated death benefits shall file with the commissioner copies of all advertising for accelerated death benefits that the insurer proposes to disseminate in the state prior to use of that material. The commissioner shall have the authority to disapprove any advertising that does not meet the requirements of this code. If the commissioner disapproves the advertising, the insurer shall not use and shall stop using the disapproved advertising. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as requiring prior approval of advertising prior to dissemination in this
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 21.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.12.

(a) Insurers shall ensure that agents offering, marketing, or selling accelerated death benefits on their behalf are able to describe the differences between benefits provided under an accelerated death benefit and benefits provided under long-term care insurance, as follows:

(1) The difference between the benefits afforded to an insured through an accelerated death benefit and a long-term care
 insurance policy or rider.

(2) The differences between benefit eligibility criteria.

(3) Whether an elimination period applies to either an accelerated death benefit or long-term care insurance and a description of the elimination period.

(4) The benefits under the accelerated death benefit or long-term care insurance if benefits are never needed.

(5) The benefits under the accelerated death benefit or long-term insurance if benefits are needed.

(6) Restrictions on benefit amounts.

(7) Tax treatment of benefits.

(8) Income and death benefit considerations.

(b) Completion of California agent education or continuing education for long-term care insurance shall meet the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.13.

In addition to other unfair trade practices described in this code, the following acts and practices in the sale of insurance under this article are prohibited:

(a) Twisting. Knowingly making any misleading representation or incomplete or fraudulent comparison of any insurance policies or insurers for the purpose of inducing, or tending to induce, any person to lapse, forfeit, surrender, terminate, retain, pledge, assign,
 borrow on or convert any insurance policy, or to take out a policy of insurance with another insurer.

(b) High pressure tactics. Employing any method of marketing having the effect of, or tending to, induce the purchase of insurance through force, fright, threat, whether explicit or implied, or undue pressure to purchase or recommend the purchase of insurance.

(c) Cold lead advertising. Making use directly or indirectly of any method of marketing that fails to disclose in a conspicuous manner that a purpose of the method of marketing is solicitation of insurance and that contact will be made by an insurance agent or insurance company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.14.

(a) Accelerated death benefits shall comply with the provisions in Sections 10113.71 and 10113.72.

(b) Every insurer offering term life insurance with accelerated death benefits or any rider that provides for accelerated death benefits described in Section 10295 shall also offer a waiver of premium benefit for the life insurance premium and any premium charged for the accelerated death benefit as
 described in Section 10271.1.

(c) Every insurer offering a cash value life insurance policy or rider offering accelerated death benefits described in Section 10295 shall disclose all premium default protection options in the policy and at the time of the application, including waiver of premium options available under Section 10271.1 and automatic premium loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.15.

(a) Except at the request of the policyholder or contractholder, all accelerated death benefit provisions or supplemental contracts shall be renewable for the life of the underlying life insurance policy, provided the premiums are timely paid. The statement shall be prominently displayed on the first page of the accelerated death benefit policy or rider.

(b) If an accelerated death benefit is offered with an underlying term life insurance policy, the accelerated death benefit shall include a prominent statement on page one that the accelerated death benefit terminates with the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 360, Sec. 4.   (AB 2578)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.16.

Termination of an accelerated death benefit shall not prejudice the payment of benefits for any qualifying event that occurred while the accelerated death benefit was in force.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.17.

An insurer that fails to conform to the requirements provided under this article shall be subject to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.18.

Accelerated death benefits shall not limit or exclude coverage by type of illness, treatment, medical condition, or accident, except under the circumstances described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (g) of Section 10271.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.19.

A policy, certificate, rider, or endorsement shall include a provision giving the policyholder or certificate holder the right to appeal to the insurer a decision regarding benefit eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Policy Form Generally—Uniform Provisions [10320. - 10328.]

10320.

No policy of accident and sickness insurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state unless all of the following apply:

(a) The entire money and other considerations therefor are expressed therein.

(b) The time at which the insurance takes effect and terminates is expressed therein.

(c) It purports to insure only one person, except that a policy may insure, originally or by subsequent amendment, upon the application of the head of a family who shall be deemed the policyholder, any two or more eligible members of that family, including spouse,
 dependent children, or any children under a specified age which shall not exceed 19 years of age and any other person dependent upon the policyholder.

(d) The style, arrangement and over-all appearance of the policy give no undue prominence to any portion of the text, and unless every printed portion of the text of the policy and of any endorsements or attached papers is plainly printed in light-faced type of a style in general use, the size of which shall be uniform and not less than 10-point with a lower case unspaced alphabet length not less than 120-point (the “text” shall include all printed matter except the name and address of the insurer, name or title of the policy, the brief description, if any, and captions and subcaptions).

(e) The exceptions and reductions of indemnity are set forth in the policy and, except those which are set forth in Article 4a or 5a of this
 chapter, are printed, at the insurer’s option, either included with the benefit provision to which they apply, or under an appropriate caption such as “Exceptions,” or “Exceptions and Reductions”; provided, that if an exception or reduction specifically applies only to a particular benefit of the policy, a statement of such exception or reduction shall be included with the benefit provision to which it applies.

(f) Each such form, including riders and endorsements, shall be identified by a form number in the lower left-hand corner of the first page thereof.

(g) It contains no provision purporting to make any portion of the charter, rules, constitution, or bylaws of the insurer a part of the policy unless such portion is set forth in full in the policy, except in the case of the incorporation of, or reference to, a statement of rates or classification of risks, or short-rate table
 filed with the commissioner.

(h) If the policy contains amendment, change, limitation, alteration, or restriction of the printed text by endorsement, or by any means other than rider upon a separate piece of paper made a part of such policy.

(i) If any portion of such policy purports to reduce benefits by reason of age of the insured and such reduction, in accordance with the age of the insured as stated in his or her application, would be effective on the issue date of the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 59.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10321.

After issuance a disability policy shall not be amended, changed, limited, altered, or restricted by any means other than rider upon a separate piece of paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10322.

If any disability policy is issued by an insurer domiciled in this State for delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the official having responsibility for the administration of the insurance laws of such other state shall have advised the commissioner that any such policy is not subject to approval or disapproval by such official, the commissioner may by ruling require that such policy meet the standards set forth in Section 10320 and in Articles 4a and 5a of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10323.

If any provision set forth in Article 4a or 5a of this chapter is in whole or in part inapplicable to or inconsistent with the coverage provided by a particular form of policy the insurer, with the approval of the commissioner, shall omit from such policy any inapplicable provision or part of a provision, and shall modify any inconsistent provision or part of the provision in such manner as to make the provision as contained in the policy consistent with the coverage provided by the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10324.

The provisions which are the subject of Article 4a or 5a of this chapter or any corresponding provisions which are used in lieu thereof in accordance with such articles, shall be printed in the consecutive order of the provisions in such articles or, at the option of the insurer, any such provision may appear as a unit in any part of the policy, with other provisions with which it may be logically related, providing the resulting policy shall not be in whole or in part unintelligible, uncertain, ambiguous, abstruse, or likely to mislead a person to whom the policy is offered, delivered or issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10325.

The word “insured,” as used in this chapter, shall not be construed as preventing a person other than the insured with a proper insurable interest from making application for and owning a policy covering the insured or from being entitled under such a policy to any indemnities, benefits and rights provided therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10326.

Any disability policy of a foreign or alien insurer, when delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State, may contain any provision which is not less favorable to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions of this chapter and which is prescribed or required by the law of the state under which the insurer is organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10326.5.

Any disability policy of a domestic insurer may, when issued for delivery in any other state or country, contain any provision permitted or required by the laws of such other state or country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10327.

The commissioner may make such reasonable rules and regulations concerning the procedure for the filing or submission of policies subject to this chapter as are necessary, proper or advisable to its administration. This provision shall not abridge any other authority granted the commissioner by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10328.

No policy provision which is not subject to Article 4a or 5a of this chapter shall make a policy or any portion thereof less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions thereof which are subject to such articles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Compulsory Standard Provisions—Uniform Provisions [10350. - 10354.]

10350.

Except as provided in Section 10323, each disability policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State shall contain the provisions specified in Sections 10350.1 to 10350.12, inclusive, in the words in which the same appear in such sections; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, substitute for one or more of such provisions corresponding provisions of different wording approved by the commissioner which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary. Such provisions shall be preceded individually by the caption appearing in each section or, at the option of the insurer, by such appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the commissioner may approve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.1.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein.

Entire Contract; Changes: This policy, including the endorsements and the attached papers, if any, constitutes the entire contract of insurance. No change in this policy shall be valid until approved by an executive officer of the insurer and unless such approval be endorsed hereon or attached hereto. No agent has authority to change this policy or to waive any of its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.2.
